Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7744.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-33 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-33. Drug coverage.
No Any group health insurer subject to the provisions of this chapter that provides coverage
for prescription drugs under a group plan master contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state shall offer a minimum of two (2) options for the delivery of prescription drugs, but is
prohibited from requiring may require any person covered under the contract to obtain prescription
drugs from a mail order pharmacy as a condition of obtaining benefits for the drugs.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-26. Drug coverage.
No Any group health insurer subject to the provisions of this chapter that provides coverage
for prescription drugs under a group plan master contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state shall offer a minimum of two (2) options for the delivery of prescription drugs, but is
prohibited from requiring may require any person covered under the contract to obtain prescription
drugs from a mail order pharmacy as a condition of obtaining benefits for the drugs.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-23. Drug coverage.

No Any group health insurer subject to the provisions of this chapter that provides coverage
for prescription drugs under a group plan master contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state shall offer a minimum of two (2) options for the delivery of prescription drugs, but is
prohibited from requiring may require any person covered under the contract to obtain prescription
drugs from a mail order pharmacy as a condition of obtaining benefits for the drugs.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-38 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-38. Drug coverage.
No Any health maintenance organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs
under a group plan master contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state shall offer
a minimum of two (2) options for the delivery of prescription drugs, but is prohibited from requiring
may require any person covered under the contract to obtain prescription drugs from a mail order
pharmacy as a condition of obtaining benefits for the drugs.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005064
========
LC005064 - Page 2 of 3